Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendments to this part, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

21-2-130.
Procedures for qualification of candidates generally.

Candidates may qualify for an election as follows:

Nomination through a political party primary;

Filing a notice of candidacy and affidavit and paying a qualifying fee or filing a pauper’s affidavit with a pauper’s petition in conjunction with:

Filing a nomination petition declared lawful pursuant to Code Section 21-2-171 either as an independent candidate or as a nominee of a political body, if duly certified by the chairperson and the secretary of the political body as having been nominated in a duly constituted political body convention as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-172;

Nomination for a state-wide office by a duly constituted political body convention as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-172 if the political body making the nomination has qualified to nominate candidates for state-wide public office under the provisions of Code Section 21-2-180;

Candidacy in a special election as prescribed in subsection (e) of Code Section 21-2-132;

Qualifying as an incumbent candidate to succeed such incumbent as prescribed in subsection (e) of Code Section 21-2-132; or

Candidacy for election to a nonpartisan office;

In the case of an election for presidential electors, nomination as prescribed by rules of a political party and subsection (f) of Code Section 21-2-153; or

Substitute nomination by a political party or body as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-134.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 6; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 3; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 2/HB 268.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “as follows” for “by virtue of” at the end of the introductory paragraph; substituted “through a political party primary” for “in a primary conducted by a political party” at the end of paragraph (1);
rewrote paragraph (2); added subparagraphs (2)(A) through (2)(E); deleted former paragraph (3), which read: “Nomination for a state-wide office by a duly constituted political body convention as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-172 if the political body making the nomination has qualified to nominate candidates for state-wide public office under the provisions of Code Section 21-2-180;”; redesignated former paragraphs (4) and (5) as present paragraphs (3) and (4), respectively; in paragraph (3), inserted “and subsection (f) of Code Section 21-2-153” and added “or” at the end; substituted “Code Section 21-2-134” for “Code Sections 21-2-134 and 21-2-155, respectively;” at the end of paragraph (4); deleted former paragraph (6), which read: “Candidacy in a special election as prescribed in subsection (e) of Code Section 21-2-132; or”; and deleted former paragraph (7), which read: “Being an incumbent qualifying as a candidate to succeed such incumbent as prescribed in subsection (e) of Code Section 21-2-132.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the impact on bond issues of challenges to voting procedures, see 15 Ga. St. B. J. 15 (1978).

For note, “Georgia’s Runoff Election System Has Run Its Course,” see 54 Ga. L. Rev. 1063 (2020).

21-2-131.
Fixing and publishing of qualification fees; manner of payment; distribution of fees paid.

Qualification fees for party and public offices shall be fixed and published as follows:

The governing authority of any county or municipality, not later than February 1 of any year in which a general primary, nonpartisan election, or general election is to be held, and at least 35 days prior to the special primary or election in the case of a special primary or special election, shall fix and publish a qualifying fee for each county or municipal office to be filled in the upcoming primary or election. Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, such fee shall be 3 percent of the total gross salary of the office paid in the preceding calendar year including all supplements authorized by law if a salaried office.

For the offices of clerk of the superior court, judge of the probate court, sheriff, tax commissioner, and magistrate, the qualifying fee shall be 3 percent of the minimum salary specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 15-6-88, paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-9-63, subsection (a) of Code Section 15-10-23, paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 15-16-20, and paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 48-5-183, exclusive of supplements, cost-of-living increases, and longevity increases. For the office of members of the county governing authority, the qualifying fee shall be 3 percent of the base salary established by local Act of the General Assembly or by Code Section 36-5-25 as adjusted pursuant to Code Section 36-5-24, if applicable, exclusive of compensation supplements for training provided for in Code Section 36-5-27 and cost-of-living adjustments pursuant to Code Section 36-5-28. If not a salaried office, a reasonable fee shall be set by the governing authority of such county or municipality, such fee not to exceed 3 percent of the income derived from such county office by the person holding the office for the preceding year or more than $35.00 for a municipal office;

Within the same time limitation as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Secretary of State shall fix and publish a qualifying fee for any candidate qualifying by this method with a state political party and for any candidate qualifying with the Secretary of State for a nonpartisan election and for any candidate filing with the Secretary of State his or her notice of candidacy for a general or special election. Such fee shall be 3 percent of the annual salary of the office if a salaried office, except that the fee for members of the General Assembly shall be $400.00. If not a salaried office, a reasonable fee shall be set by the Secretary of State, such fee not to exceed 3 percent of the income derived from such office by the person holding the office for the preceding year;

A reasonable qualifying fee may be set according to party rule for each political party office to be filled in a primary. Such fees shall be set and published by the county or state political party not later than February 1 of the year in which the primary is to be held for the filling of such party office.

Qualifying fees shall be paid as follows:

The qualifying fee for a candidate in a primary shall be paid to the county or state political party at the time the candidate qualifies;

The qualifying fee for all other candidates shall be paid to the superintendent or Secretary of State at the time the notice of candidacy is filed by the candidate.

Qualifying fees shall be prorated and distributed as follows:

Fees paid to the county political party: 50 percent to be retained by the county political party with which the candidate qualified; 50 percent to be transmitted to the superintendent of the county with the party’s certified list of candidates not later than 12:00 Noon of the third day after the deadline for qualifying in the case of a general primary and by 12:00 Noon of the day following the closing of qualifications in the case of a special primary. Such fees shall be transmitted as soon as practicable by the superintendent to the governing authority of the county, to be applied toward the cost of the primary and election;

Fees paid to the state political party: 75 percent to be retained by the state political party; 25 percent to be transmitted to the Secretary of State with the party’s certified list of candidates not later than 12:00 Noon of the third day after the deadline for qualifying in the case of a general primary and by 12:00 Noon of the day following the closing of qualifications in the case of a special primary. Such fees shall be transmitted as soon as practicable by the Secretary of State as follows: one-third to the state treasury and two-thirds divided among the governing authorities of the counties in the candidate’s district in proportion to the population of each such county according to the last United States decennial census, such fees to be applied to the cost of holding the election;

Qualification fees paid to the superintendent of the county:

If the person qualifies as a candidate of a political body, 50 percent shall be transmitted to the state executive committee of the appropriate political body and 50 percent shall be retained by the superintendent of the county;

If the person qualifies directly with the election superintendent as a candidate of a political party in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 21-2-153, 25 percent shall be transmitted to the state executive committee of the appropriate political party and 75 percent shall be retained by the superintendent of the county; and

If the person qualifies as an independent or nonpartisan candidate, the superintendent of the county shall retain the entire amount of the fees.

Such fees shall be transmitted as soon as practicable by the superintendent to the governing authority of the county, to be applied toward the cost of holding the election;

Qualification fees paid to the Secretary of State shall be prorated and distributed as follows:

If the person qualifies as the candidate of a political body, 75 percent shall be transmitted to the appropriate political body and 25 percent shall be retained by the Secretary of State; and

If the person qualifies as an independent or nonpartisan candidate, the Secretary of State shall retain the entire amount of the fees.

Such fees shall be transmitted as soon as practicable by the Secretary of State as follows: one-third to the state treasury and two-thirds divided among the governing authorities of the counties in proportion to the population of each county according to the last United States decennial census, such fees to be applied to the cost of holding the election;

Qualification fees paid to the superintendent of a municipality:

If the person qualifies as a candidate of a political body, 50 percent shall be transmitted to the state executive committee of the appropriate political body and 50 percent shall be retained by the superintendent of the municipality; and

If the person qualifies as an independent or nonpartisan candidate, the superintendent of the municipality shall retain the entire amount of the fees.

Such fees shall be transmitted as soon as practicable by the superintendent to the governing authority of the municipality, to be applied toward the cost of holding the election.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 504, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 172, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1004, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 10A; Code 1933, § 34-1013, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1974, p. 4, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 897, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 294, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2510, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 617, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1122, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 103, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1 and Ga. L. 1998, p. 1122, § 1 made a conflicting change in paragraph (a)(1). Because the governor signed Ga. L. 1998, p. 1122 later in time, the change made by that act takes precedence.

Law reviews.

For comment on Jenness v. Little, Civil No. 12762 (N.D. Ga. 1969), holding bar against placement of candidate’s name on ballot due to inability to pay qualifying fee is denial of equal protection, see 18 J. of Pub. L. 483 (1969).

For comment on Stoner v. Fortson, Civil No. 16271 (N.D. Ga. May 11, 1972), holding fee requirement for placement on primary ballot unconstitutional, see 22 J. of Pub. L. 243 (1973).

21-2-132.
Filing notice of candidacy, nomination petition, and affidavit; payment of qualifying fee; pauper’s affidavit and qualifying petition for exemption from qualifying fee; military service.

The names of nominees of political parties nominated in a primary and the names of nominees of political parties for the office of presidential elector shall be placed on the election ballot without their filing the notice of candidacy otherwise required by this Code section.

Candidates seeking election in a nonpartisan election shall comply with the requirements of subsections (c) and (f) of this Code section, as modified by subsection (g) of this Code section, by the date prescribed and shall by the same date pay to the proper authority the qualifying fee prescribed by Code Section 21-2-131 in order to be eligible to have their names placed on the nonpartisan election ballots.

All candidates seeking election in a nonpartisan election shall file their notice of candidacy and pay the prescribed qualifying fee by the date prescribed in this subsection in order to be eligible to have their names placed on the nonpartisan election ballot by the Secretary of State or election superintendent, as the case may be, in the following manner:

Each candidate for the office of judge of the superior court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or Justice of the Supreme Court, or the candidate’s agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the nonpartisan election ballot shall file a notice of candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address, and the office sought, in the office of the Secretary of State no earlier than 9:00 A.M. on the Monday of the eleventh week immediately prior to the election and no later than 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays;

Each candidate for a county judicial office, a local board of education office, or an office of a consolidated government, or the candidate’s agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the nonpartisan election ballot shall file notice of candidacy in the office of the superintendent no earlier than 9:00 A.M. on the Monday of the eleventh week immediately prior to the election and no later than 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays;

Each candidate for a nonpartisan municipal office or a designee shall file a notice of candidacy in the office of the municipal superintendent of such candidate’s municipality during the municipality’s nonpartisan qualifying period. Each municipal superintendent shall designate the days of such qualifying period, which shall be no less than three days and no more than five days. The days of the qualifying period shall be consecutive days. Nonpartisan qualifying periods shall commence no earlier than 8:30 A.M. on the third Monday in August immediately preceding the general election and shall end no later than 4:30 P.M. on the following Friday; and, in the case of a special election, the municipal nonpartisan qualifying period shall commence no earlier than the date of the call and shall end no later than 25 days prior to the election.

In any case in which no individual has filed a notice of candidacy and paid the prescribed qualifying fee to fill a particular office in a nonpartisan municipal election, the governing authority of the municipality shall be authorized to reopen qualifying for candidates at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday next following the close of the preceding qualifying period and cease such qualifying at 5:00 P.M. on the Tuesday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that such days may be legal holidays; and

In any case where an incumbent has filed notice of candidacy and paid the prescribed qualifying fee in a nonpartisan election to succeed himself or herself in office but withdraws as a candidate for such office prior to the close of the applicable qualifying period prescribed in this subsection, qualifying for candidates other than such incumbent shall be reopened at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday next following the close of the preceding qualifying period and shall cease at 5:00 P.M. on the Tuesday immediately following such reopening, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays.

All political body and independent candidates shall file their notice of candidacy and pay the prescribed qualifying fee by the date prescribed in this subsection in order to be eligible to have their names placed on the election ballot by the Secretary of State or election superintendent, as the case may be, in the following manner:

Each elector for President or Vice President of the United States, or his or her agent, desiring to have the names of his or her candidates for President and Vice President placed on the election ballot shall file a notice of his or her candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address, and the office he or she is seeking, in the office of the Secretary of State during the period beginning at 9:00 A.M. on the fourth Monday in June immediately prior to the election and ending at 12:00 Noon on the Friday following the fourth Monday in June, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays;

Each candidate for United States Senate, United States House of Representatives, or state office, or his or her agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the election ballot shall file a notice of his or her candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address, and the office he or she is seeking, in the office of the Secretary of State during the period beginning at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday of the thirty-fifth week immediately prior to the election and ending at 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays, in the case of a general election. In the case of a special election to fill a federal office listed in this subsection, each candidate shall file a notice of his or her candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address, and the office he or she is seeking, in the office of the Secretary of State no earlier than the date of the call of the special election and no later than 60 days prior to the special election. In the case of a special election to fill a state office, each candidate shall file a notice of his or her candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address, and the office he or she is seeking, in the office of the Secretary of State no earlier than the date of the call of the special election and no later than 25 days prior to the special election;

Each candidate for a county office, or his or her agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the election ballot shall file notice of his or her candidacy in the office of the superintendent of his or her county during the period beginning at 9:00 A.M. on the Monday of the thirty-fifth week immediately prior to the election and ending at 12:00 Noon on the Friday immediately following such Monday, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays, in the case of a general election and no earlier than the date of the call of the election and no later than 25 days prior to the election in the case of a special election;

Each candidate for municipal office or a designee shall file a notice of candidacy in the office of the municipal superintendent of such candidate’s municipality during the municipality’s qualifying period. Each municipal superintendent shall designate the days of the qualifying period, which shall be no less than three days and no more than five days. The days of the qualifying period shall be consecutive days. Qualifying periods shall commence no earlier than 8:30 A.M. on the third Monday in August immediately preceding the general election and shall end no later than 4:30 P.M. on the following Friday; and, in the case of a special election, the municipal qualifying period shall commence no earlier than the date of the call and shall end no later than 25 days prior to the election; and

In extraordinary circumstances as described in Code Section 21-2-543.1, each candidate, or his or her agent, desiring to have his or her name placed on the election ballot shall file a notice of his or her candidacy, giving his or her name, residence address, and the office he or she is seeking, with the office of the Secretary of State no earlier than the date of the call of the special election and no later than ten days after the announcement of such extraordinary circumstances.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply where, during the 75 day period beginning on the date of the announcement of the vacancy:

A regularly scheduled general election for the vacant office is to be held; or

Another special election for the vacant office is to be held pursuant to a writ for a special election issued by the Governor prior to the date of the announcement of the vacancy.

The hours of qualifying each day shall be from 8:30 A.M. until 4:30 P.M. with one hour allowed for the lunch break; provided, however, that municipalities which have normal business hours which cover a lesser period of time shall conduct qualifying during normal business hours for each such municipality. Except in the case of a special election, notice of the opening and closing dates and the hours for candidates to qualify shall be published at least two weeks prior to the opening of the qualifying period.

Each candidate required to file a notice of candidacy by this Code section shall, no earlier than 9:00 A.M. on the fourth Monday in June immediately prior to the election and no later than 12:00 Noon on the second Tuesday in July immediately prior to the election, file with the same official with whom he or she filed his or her notice of candidacy a nomination petition in the form prescribed in Code Section 21-2-170, except that such petition shall not be required if such candidate is:

A nominee of a political party for the office of presidential elector when such party has held a national convention and therein nominated candidates for President and Vice President of the United States;

Seeking office in a special election;

An incumbent qualifying as a candidate to succeed himself or herself;

A candidate seeking election in a nonpartisan election; or

A nominee for a state-wide office by a duly constituted political body convention, provided that the political body making the nomination has qualified to nominate candidates for state-wide public office under the provisions of Code Section 21-2-180.

Each candidate required by this Code section to file a notice of candidacy shall accompany his or her notice of candidacy with an affidavit stating:

His or her full name and the name as the candidate desires it to be listed on the ballot. The surname of the candidate shall be the surname of the candidate as it appears on the candidate’s voter registration card unless the candidate provides proof that his or her surname as it appears on the candidate’s registration card is incorrect in which event the correct name shall be listed. After such name is submitted to the Secretary of State or the election superintendent, the form of such name shall not be changed during the election for which such notice of candidacy is submitted;

His or her residence, with street and number, if any, and his or her post office address;

His or her profession, business, or occupation, if any;

The name of his or her precinct;

That he or she is an elector of the county or municipality of his or her residence eligible to vote in the election in which he or she is a candidate;

The name of the office he or she is seeking;

That he or she is eligible to hold such office;

That the candidate has never been convicted and sentenced in any court of competent jurisdiction for fraudulent violation of primary or election laws, malfeasance in office, or felony involving moral turpitude or conviction of domestic violence under the laws of this state or any other state or of the United States, or that the candidate’s civil rights have been restored and that at least ten years have elapsed from the date of the completion of the sentence without a subsequent conviction of another felony involving moral turpitude;

That he or she will not knowingly violate this chapter or rules and regulations adopted under this chapter; and

Any other information as may be determined by the Secretary of State to be necessary to comply with federal and state law.

The affidavit shall contain such other information as may be prescribed by the officer with whom the candidate files his or her notice of candidacy.

A pauper’s affidavit may be filed in lieu of paying the qualifying fee otherwise required by this Code section and Code Sections 21-2-131 and 21-2-138 of any candidate who has filed a qualifying petition as provided for in subsection (h) of this Code section. A candidate filing a pauper’s affidavit instead of paying a qualifying fee shall under oath affirm his or her poverty and his or her resulting inability to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required. The form of the affidavit shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State and shall include a financial statement which lists the total income, assets, liabilities, and other relevant financial information of the candidate and shall indicate on its face that the candidate has neither the assets nor the income to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required. The affidavit shall contain an oath that such candidate has neither the assets nor the income to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required. The following warning shall be printed on the affidavit form prepared by the Secretary of State, to wit: “WARNING: Any person knowingly making any false statement on this affidavit commits the offense of false swearing and shall be guilty of a felony.” The name of any candidate who subscribes and swears to an oath that such candidate has neither the assets nor the income to pay the qualifying fee otherwise required shall be placed on the ballot by the Secretary of State or election superintendent, as the case may be.

No candidate shall be authorized to file a pauper’s affidavit in lieu of paying the qualifying fee otherwise required by this Code section and Code Section 21-2-138 unless such candidate has filed a qualifying petition which complies with the following requirements:

A qualifying petition of a candidate seeking an office which is voted upon state wide shall be signed by a number of voters equal to one-fourth of 1 percent of the total number of registered voters eligible to vote in the last election for the filling of the office the candidate is seeking and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected. A qualifying petition of a candidate for any other office shall be signed by a number of voters equal to 1 percent of the total number of registered voters eligible to vote in the last election for the filling of the office the candidate is seeking and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected. However, in the case of a candidate seeking an office for which there has never been an election or seeking an office in a newly constituted constituency, the percentage figure shall be computed on the total number of registered voters in the constituency who would have been qualified to vote for such office had the election been held at the last general election and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected;

Each person signing a qualifying petition shall declare therein that he or she is a duly qualified and registered elector of the state entitled to vote in the next election for the filling of the office sought by the candidate supported by the petition and shall add to his or her signature his or her residence address, giving municipality, if any, and county, with street and number, if any. No person shall sign the same petition more than once. Each petition shall support the candidacy of only a single candidate. A signature shall be stricken from the petition when the signer so requests prior to the presentation of the petition to the appropriate officer for filing, but such a request shall be disregarded if made after such presentation. Each sheet shall bear on the bottom or back thereof the affidavit of the circulator of such sheet, which shall be subscribed and sworn to by such circulator before a notary public and shall set forth:

His or her residence address, giving municipality with street and number, if any;

That each signer manually signed his or her own name with full knowledge of the contents of the qualifying petition;

That each signature on such sheet was signed within 180 days of the last day on which such petition may be filed; and

That, to the best of the affiant’s knowledge and belief, the signers are registered electors of the state qualified to sign the petition, that their respective residences are correctly stated in the petition, and that they all reside in the county named in the affidavit;

A qualifying petition shall be in the form and manner determined by the Secretary of State and approved by the State Elections Board;

No qualifying petition shall be circulated prior to 180 days before the last day on which such petition may be filed, and no signature shall be counted unless it was signed within 180 days of the last day for filing the same; and

A qualifying petition shall not be amended or supplemented after its presentation to the appropriate officer for filing.

No notary public may sign the petition as an elector or serve as a circulator of any petition which he or she notarized. Any and all sheets of a petition that have the circulator’s affidavit notarized by a notary public who also served as a circulator of one or more sheets of the petition or who signed one of the sheets of the petition as an elector shall be disqualified and rejected.

Reserved.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any elected public officer who is performing ordered military duty, as defined in Code Section 38-2-279, shall be eligible for reelection in any primary or general election which may be held to elect a successor for the next term of office, and may qualify in absentia as a candidate for reelection to such office. The performance of ordered military duty shall not create a vacancy in such office during the term for which such public officer was elected.

Where the giving of written notice of candidacy is required, any elected public officer who is performing ordered military duty may deliver such notice by mail, agent, or messenger to the proper elections official. Any other act required by law of a candidate may, during the time such officer is on ordered military duty, be performed by an agent designated in writing by the absent public officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 3; Code 1933, § 34-1904; Ga. L. 1948, Ex. Sess., p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 618, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1001, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 224, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 826, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 858, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 5; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 8B; Code 1933, § 34-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1971, p. 602, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 16; Ga. L. 1979, p. 955, § 4; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1718, §§ 4, 11; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 6-5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, § 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 4; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 780, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1038, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 32, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 647, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 5; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1027, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 145, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 23, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 11; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, §§ 13, 14/HB 244; Ga. L. 2006, p. 69, § 1/SB 467; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 6/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2009, p. 311, § 2/HB 156; Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, § 1/HB 158; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 2A/SB 82; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 5/SB 92; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2016, p. 173, §§ 2, 3/SB 199; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 21/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 3/HB 268; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 21/SB 365.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote paragraph (d)(1); added paragraph (d)(2); redesignated former paragraph (d)(2) as present paragraph (d)(3); and, in paragraph (d)(3), deleted “either” following “his or her county” near the middle, and deleted “or during the period beginning at 9:00 A.M. on the fourth Monday in June immediately prior to the election and ending at 12:00 Noon on the Friday following the fourth Monday in June, notwithstanding the fact that any such days may be legal holidays,” following “may be legal holidays,” near the end; and redesignated former paragraphs (d)(3) and (d)(4) as present paragraphs (d)(4) and (d)(5), respectively.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “local board of education” for “local school board” near the beginning of paragraph (c)(2).

Cross references.

Persons ineligible to hold public office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

False swearing generally, §

16-10-71

.

Exercise of Secretary of State’s duty upon failure to comply with write-in candidacy requirements, §

21-2-499

.

Penalties for offenses relating to nomination petitions, §§

21-2-563

,

21-2-564

.

Penalty for making of false statement in connection with filing of notice of candidacy, §

21-2-565

.

Qualifying in absentia for magistrates serving on active duty, §

15-10-20.1

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section

28-9-3

, in 2011, the amendment of subparagraphs (i)(1)(A) and (i)(1)(B) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, § 1, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 2A, due to irreconcilable conflict. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 930, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article II, Section I, Paragraph III and Article II, Section II, Paragraph III of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 21A/SB 82, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part that: “Section 2A of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2011, only if House Bill 158 is passed by the General Assembly during the 2011 regular session and is approved by the Governor or becomes law without such approval. Otherwise, Section 2A shall be repealed by operation of law on such date and shall be of no force and effect.” House Bill 158 was Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, which was approved on May 13, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Appearance of candidate’s name on ballot, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.02.

21-2-132.1.
Certification of presidential electors for independent candidate for President or Vice President of the United States; qualification.

An independent candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States shall file with the Secretary of State not later than the Friday before the opening of qualifying for such office as provided in subsection (d) of Code Section 21-2-132 a slate of candidates for the office of presidential elector which such independent candidate has certified as being the presidential electors for such independent candidate.

The candidates for presidential electors certified by an independent candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States shall then qualify for election to such office in accordance with Code Section 21-2-132.

An independent candidate for the office of President or Vice President of the United States may certify a number of candidates for the office of presidential elector that is equal to or less than the number of presidential electors who may be elected from the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-132.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 3/HB 316.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 2, 2019.

Cross references.

The Executive Branch, U.S. Const., art. II.